Illinois, session 104th, HB2258.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Railroad Employees Medical Treatment Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (610 ILCS 107/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Railroad Employees Medical Treatment Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-318, eff. 1-1-06.)